Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.050

Use of titles—Registration required.

An entity that is not registered with the department may not represent itself, or refer to itself in advertising and marketing materials as a "registered continuing care retirement community" or "continuing care retirement community," as defined by this chapter.

[ 2016 c 183 s 5.]